Utah statutes.
10-7-13.   Right of entry on premises of water user.

All authorized persons connected with the waterworks of any city or town shall have the right to enter upon any premises furnished with water by such city or town to examine the apparatus, the amount of water used and the manner of use, and to make all necessary shutoffs for vacancy, delinquency or violation of the ordinances, rules or regulations enacted or adopted by such city or town.

